Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 10 Family Court

8-10-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Family Court Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-2.
Purpose of chapter.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to the end that families whose unity or well-being is threatened shall be assisted and protected, and restored, if possible, as secure units of law-abiding members; that each child coming within the jurisdiction of the family court shall receive the care, guidance and control which will conduce to his or her welfare and the best interests of the state; and that when a child is removed from the control of his or her parents, the family court shall secure for him or her care as nearly as possible equivalent to that which his or her parents should have given him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-3.
Establishment of court — Jurisdiction — Seal — Oaths.

There is hereby established a family court, consisting of a chief judge and eleven (11) associate justices, to hear and determine all petitions for divorce from the bond of marriage and from bed and board; all motions for allowance, alimony, support and custody of children, allowance of counsel and witness fees, and other matters arising out of petitions and motions relative to real and personal property in aid thereof, including, but not limited to, partitions, accountings, receiverships, sequestration of assets, resulting and constructive trust, impressions of trust, and such other equitable matters arising out of the family relationship, wherein jurisdiction is acquired by the court by the filing of petitions for divorce, bed and board and separate maintenance; all motions for allowance for support and educational costs of children attending high school at the time of their eighteenth (18th) birthday and up to ninety (90) days after high school graduation, but in no case beyond their nineteenth (19th) birthday; enforcement of any order or decree granting alimony and/or child support, and/or custody and/or visitation of any court of competent jurisdiction of another state; modification of any order or decree granting alimony and/or custody and/or visitation of any court of competent jurisdiction of another state on the ground that there has been a change of circumstances; modification of any order or decree granting child support of any court of competent jurisdiction of another state provided: (1) the order has been registered in Rhode Island for the purposes of modification pursuant to §

15-23.1-611

, or (2) Rhode Island issued the order and has continuing exclusive jurisdiction over the parties; antenuptial agreements, property settlement agreements and all other contracts between persons, who at the time of execution of the contracts, were husband and wife or planned to enter into that relationship; complaints for support of parents and children; those matters relating to delinquent, wayward, dependent, neglected, or children with disabilities who by reason of any disability requires special education or treatment and other related services; to hear and determine all petitions for guardianship of any child who has been placed in the care, custody, and control of the department for children, youth, and families pursuant to the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14 and chapter 11 of title 40; adoption of children under eighteen (18) years of age; change of names of children under the age of eighteen (18) years; paternity of children born out of wedlock and provision for the support and disposition of such children or their mothers; child marriages; those matters referred to the court in accordance with the provisions of §

14-1-28

; those matters relating to adults who shall be involved with paternity of children born out of wedlock; responsibility for or contributing to the delinquency, waywardness, or neglect of children under sixteen (16) years of age; desertion, abandonment, or failure to provide subsistence for any children dependent upon such adults for support; neglect to send any child to school as required by law; bastardy proceedings and custody to children in proceedings, whether or not supported by petitions for divorce or separate maintenance or for relief without commencement of divorce proceedings; and appeals of administrative decisions concerning setoff of income tax refunds for past due child support in accordance with §§

44-30.1-5

and

40-6-21

. The holding of real estate as tenants by the entirety shall not in and of itself preclude the family court from partitioning real estate so held for a period of six (6) months after the entry of final decree of divorce.

The family court shall be a court of record and shall have a seal which shall contain such words and devices as the court shall adopt.

The judges and clerk of the family court shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations.

The family court shall have exclusive initial jurisdiction of all appeals from any administrative agency or board affecting or concerning children under the age of eighteen (18) years and appeals of administrative decisions concerning setoff of income tax refunds, lottery set offs, insurance intercept, and lien enforcement provisions for past due child support, in accordance with §§

44-30.1-5

and

40-6-21

, and appeals of administrative agency orders of the department of human services to withhold income under chapter 16 of title 15.

The family court shall have jurisdiction over those civil matters relating to the enforcement of laws regulating child care providers and child placing agencies.

The family court shall have exclusive jurisdiction of matters relating to the revocation or nonrenewal of a license of an obligor due to noncompliance with a court order of support, in accordance with chapter 11.1 of title 15.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, the family court shall have jurisdiction over all protective orders provided pursuant to the Rhode Island general laws, when either party is a juvenile.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 167, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 7; P.L. 1992, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 158, § 2, P.L. 1994, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1994, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 263, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 10; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 23; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 6; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 6; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 9; P.L. 2010, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 236, § 1.

8-10-3.1.
Magistrates — Appointment, duties, and powers.

The chief judge of the family court may appoint magistrates, with the advice and consent of the senate, to assist the court in the conduct of its business. A person appointed to serve as a magistrate shall be a member of the bar of Rhode Island. The powers and duties of magistrates shall be prescribed in the order appointing them.

In addition, magistrates may assist the court in:

the enforcement and implementation of chapter 23.1 of title 15,

the determination of matters that come before the court pursuant to §

8-10-4

, chapter 1 of title 14, chapters 5, 7, 8, 9, 10 and 16 of title 15, chapter 19 of title 16, chapter 11 of title 40, and chapter 5 of title 40.1.

Magistrates shall be empowered to hear and determine all motions, pretrial conferences, arraignments of juvenile offenders, probable cause hearings, and review of all such matters, including but not limited to, the temporary placement, custody, disposition and adoption of children, orders of support, final divorce decrees, and the taking of testimony in conducting all hearings relative thereto subject to the review provided for in subsection (d).

The magistrates shall serve a term of ten (10) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified and his or her powers and duties shall be prescribed in the order appointing him or her or in the rules of procedure of the family court. Any magistrate in service as of January 1, 2008 who serves at the pleasure of the chief judge of the family court may be appointed for a term of ten (10) years with the advice and consent of the senate and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the assignment of a magistrate to more than one such term, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The magistrates may be authorized:

To regulate all proceedings before him or her;

To do all acts and take all measures necessary or proper for the efficient performance of his or her duties;

To require the production before him or her of books, papers, vouchers, documents, and writings;

To rule upon the admissibility of evidence;

To issue subpoenas for the appearance of witnesses, to put witnesses on oath, to examine them, and to call parties to the proceeding and examine them upon oath;

To adjudicate a person in contempt and to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a justice of the court, for failure to appear in response to a summons or for refusal to answer questions or produce evidence or for behavior disrupting a proceeding;

To adjudicate a party in contempt and to order him or her imprisoned for not more than seventy-two (72) hours, pending review by a justice of the court, for failure to comply with a pending order to provide support or to perform any other act; and

To issue a capias and/or body attachment upon the failure of a party or witness to appear after having been properly served and, should the family court not be in session, the person apprehended may be detained at the adult correctional institution, if an adult, or at the Rhode Island training school for youth, if a child, until the next session of the family court.

A party aggrieved by an order entered by a magistrate shall be entitled to a review of the order by a justice of the family court. Unless otherwise provided in the rules of procedure of the family court, such review shall be on the record and appellate in nature. The family court shall by rules of procedure establish procedures for review of orders entered by a magistrate, and for enforcement of contempt adjudications of a magistrate.

Final orders of the family court entered in a proceeding to review an order of a magistrate may be appealed to the supreme court.

The magistrates shall be empowered to hear de novo all applications for income withholding pursuant to chapter 16 of title 15 and appeals of administrative agency orders of the department of human services to withhold income under chapter 16 of title 15.

The magistrates shall be empowered to hear all matters relating to the revocation or nonrenewal of a license of an obligor due to non-compliance with a court order of support, in accordance with chapter 11.1 of title 15.

The magistrates may be authorized by the chief judge to hear those matters on the domestic abuse prevention calendar and the nominal calendar.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 10; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 10; P.L. 1996, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 22; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 9; P.L. 2008, ch. 1, § 5.

8-10-3.2.
General magistrate of the family court.

There is hereby created within the family court the position of general magistrate of the family court who shall be appointed by the chief judge of the family court with the advice and consent of the senate for a term of ten (10) years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the assignment of the general magistrate to more than one such term, subject to the advice and consent of the senate.

The general magistrate shall be an attorney at law and a member in good standing of the Rhode Island bar.

The primary function of the general magistrate shall be the enforcement of child support decrees, orders, and law relative to child support. The general magistrate shall have all the authority and powers vested in magistrates by virtue of §§

8-10-3

,

8-10-3

.1,

9-15-19

,

9-15-21

,

9-14-26

,

9-18-8

,

9-18-9

, and

36-2-3

, and any other authority conferred upon magistrates by any general or public law or by any rule of procedure or practice of any court within the state.

The chief justice of the supreme court with the agreement of the chief judge of the family court may specially assign the general magistrate to any court of the unified judicial system; provided, however, that the general magistrate may be assigned to the superior court subject to the prior approval of the presiding justice of the superior court. When the general magistrate is so assigned he or she shall be vested, authorized, and empowered with all the powers belonging to the magistrates of the court to which he or she is specially assigned.

The general magistrate shall:

Receive all credits and retirement allowances as afforded justices under chapter 3 of this title and any other applicable law;

Be governed by the commission on judicial tenure and discipline, chapter 16 of this title, in the same manner as justices and workers’ compensation judges;

Be entitled to a special license plate under §

31-3-47

;

Receive a salary equivalent to that of a district court judge;

Be subject to all the provisions of the canons of judicial ethics; and

Be subject to all criminal laws relative to judges by virtue of §§

11-7-1

and

11-7-2

.

The general magistrate of the family court who shall at the time of passage of this section hold the position of general magistrate, shall upon retirement, at his or her own request and at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as general magistrate of the family court, as the chief judge of the family court shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such service, the general magistrate shall have all the powers and authority of general magistrate of the family court, but otherwise shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties. For any such service or assignments performed after retirement, the general magistrate shall receive no compensation whatsoever, either monetary or in kind. Such a retired general magistrate shall not be counted in the number of judicial officers provided by law for the family court.

The provisions of this section shall be afforded liberal construction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 3, § 9; P.L. 2012, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 236, § 1.

8-10-4.
Criminal cases referred to family court.

To the family court shall also be referred for hearing, adjustment, reconciliation, decision, and sentence all causes properly brought in the court or appealed from other courts in which the defendant is accused, as provided by the statutes, of abandonment of his wife or her husband or children, or both, leaving them in danger of becoming public charges; of neglect to provide according to their means for his wife or her husband or children, or both; of neglect or refusal of an habitual drunkard to aid in the support of his or her family; of neglect or refusal by a child over eighteen (18) years of age to provide for the support and maintenance of his or her father or mother; or of threat to commit a crime or offense against the person or property of the defendant’s husband, wife, children, father, or mother.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 88, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 316, § 1.

8-10-5.
Attempts at reconciliation by family court.

In all the causes in §

8-10-4

, the family court shall seek to reconcile the parties and to re-establish friendly family relations, and to this end may suggest and hold conferences in chambers with the parties interested, and with their counsel, if they are represented by counsel and may have the children of the parties brought before it for examination.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 8.

8-10-6.
Notice to department of human services.

The clerk of the family court shall notify the director of the department of human services of the names and addresses, if known to him or her, of the parties to any proceeding in the court, so that the director, if the parties or any of them are recipients of public assistance, shall make known the interest of his or her department in the proceedings and shall enter an appearance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-7.
Family counselling service.

Within the family court there shall be a family counselling service, consisting of such personnel as the court shall deem necessary to assist the court in advising and counselling the parties and whose qualifications shall be established by the court. The justices of the family court or a majority of them shall be the appointing authority of the family counselling personnel. The court is specifically authorized to make use of existing private and public family and other service agencies in the functioning of the family counselling service. The family counselling service shall, where desirable, possible, and practicable, make use of the counsel and advice of a member of the clergy of the faith of each or all of the parties and shall, where desirable, possible, and practicable, consult the clergy of the parish or congregation of each of the respective parties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 415, § 1.

8-10-8.
Medical, psychological, and other expert assistance.

The department of human services shall provide for the family court the services of such physicians, psychiatrists, experts, and consultants approved by the court as shall be necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the court is established.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-9.
Assistance of services of department of corrections.

The facilities of the department of corrections shall be available at all times to the court. The director of the department of corrections shall assign to service in the court a supervisor of probation counsellors, probation counsellors, and other workers to carry out the purposes of the court. The supervisor, counsellors, and workers, when so assigned, shall be responsible to the court and shall serve in the court at the pleasure of the chief judge in his or her capacity as administrative judge.

At the request of the court, the director of the department of corrections, his or her assistants, and the bureau of mental hygiene shall make such investigation or examination, or both, as the court or any justice thereof may request of any party within its jurisdiction, and shall file with the court a written report of the investigation or examination, or both, within the time fixed by the court. Any party in interest or his or her counsel shall be entitled to examine the report, and shall be given the opportunity to cross-examine under oath the person who submits the report, and to introduce evidence in support of or in opposition to it before a decision is rendered by the court. The written report of investigation or examination shall not be used as evidence in any criminal matter heard by the court.

At the direction of the court, the supervisor of probation counsellors, probation counsellors, and other workers shall assume responsibility for the enforcement of all preliminary, interlocutory, and decretal orders in cases referred to them by the court. The court may order payments of temporary or permanent alimony for the support of a wife or children, or both, to the supervisor, counsellors, or workers for the account of the wife or children, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-10.
Family court registry.

Within the family court there shall be a registry, to be administered by the clerk of the court, which shall receive and disburse all payments made payable to the registry by direction of the court or by voluntary payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 22.

8-10-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 263, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 5, effective June 2, 1994. For present comparable provisions, see §

8-16.1-1

et seq.

8-10-12.
Vacancy in office or inability of chief judge of family court.

Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of chief judge of the family court, or whenever the chief judge shall be unable, by reason of illness or absence, to perform the duties of his or her office, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided in §

8-3-4

for filling a vacancy in the office of presiding justice of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 231, § 2, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 238, § 2, effective July 25, 2010.

8-10-14.
Administration of operation of family court.

The chief judge of the family court shall be the administrative judge of the court. He or she shall be the head of the court and have supervision and control of the calendars and of the assignment of the justices. All court stenographers, secretaries, and masters shall be under his or her supervision. It shall be his or her duty to gather such statistics as shall reflect accurately the work of the court, for the information of the court and such other use as he or she may deem expedient. He or she shall also be charged with general responsibility for any recommendations he or she may believe important for the work of the court or any officers in any way connected therewith.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 126, § 1.

8-10-14.1.
Powers of justices of the peace.

The chief judge of the family court shall from time to time appoint, with power to revoke such appointments, from those qualified justices of the peace who shall be members of the bar of the state of Rhode Island as many such justices of the peace as he or she may deem necessary who shall be authorized to set and take bail in all complaints bailable before the family court except those offenses punishable by life imprisonment, and, if unable to post bail, to commit to the adult correctional institutions all respondents arrested on such complaints, and the chief judge shall authorize the justices of the peace so appointed by him or her to issue warrants and complaints returnable to the family court, for any offense for which by law a judge of the family court may issue a warrant and complaint, and all warrants so issued, and all warrants and complaints upon which bail is taken or commitments are made shall be forthwith returned to family court; provided, that the justices of the peace shall not in any case or for any purpose have the power to issue search warrants.

In the event that session of family court is not held in any of the counties on the next weekday (Monday thru Friday) after appearance by a respondent before a justice of the peace, then the justice of the peace may schedule the arraignment of the respondent in the closest county (if in session on the next day following) or in Providence county as he or she shall be directed by the administrative orders of the chief judge of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 97, § 1.

8-10-14.2.
Recording and certification of appointments and revocations — Signature of warrants.

The appointments and revocations of justices of the peace shall be recorded in the records of the court and certified, by the chief judge making the appointment and revocation, to the secretary of state, and the judge shall also issue to the justice or justices of the peace his or her warrant under the seal of the court, by which the justice or justices shall be authorized to perform the duties herein specified, and shall also, whenever he or she shall revoke the appointment, notify the justice of the peace in writing of the revocation. Justices of the peace appointed to issue warrants shall sign all warrants by them issued as “justice of the peace authorized to issue warrants.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 97, § 1.

8-10-15.
Family court administrator.

There shall be a family court administrator who shall be appointed by the chief judge of the family court in his or her capacity as administrative judge of the court, with the advice and consent of the senate, and who shall hold office for a term of five (5) years.

Under the general supervision of the chief judge of the family court, within the policies established by the court, the administrator shall:

Prepare an annual budget for the court;

Formulate procedures governing the administration of court services;

Make recommendations to the court for improvement in court services;

Collect necessary statistics and prepare the annual report of the work of the court;

Provide supervision and consultation to the staff of the court concerning administration of court services, training and supervision of personnel, and fiscal management;

Perform such other duties as the chief judge shall specify;

And further to assume and perform, in addition to any other duties provided by this chapter, the powers, authority, and the duties of the family court clerk, pursuant to the provisions of the general laws, and shall do and perform all other things which by law or the rules of the court shall appertain to the office of clerk.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 10, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 21, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 119, § 3.

8-10-16.
Quarters.

The director of administration shall provide the family court with proper quarters and facilities necessary for the performance of the duties of the court. He or she shall also provide the clerk of said court with adequate quarters and facilities necessary for the performance of his or her duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 144, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 12, § 1 and P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 71, § 1, effective February 15, 1991 and June 7, 1991, respectively.

8-10-18.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 12, § 1, effective May 1, 2008.

8-10-19.
Limitation on transfer or parole of juveniles.

During the period when a juvenile shall be placed in the receiving and screening unit or in the youth correctional center, no transfer or parole of the juvenile shall be made except with the consent of the chief judge of the family court, or, in his or her absence, with the consent of the justice who initially heard, or has pending before him or her, the matter involving such juvenile.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-20.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L., §

8-10-20

, as enacted by P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1975, ch. 247, § 2. For present law, see §

8-15-7

.

8-10-21.
Records of court.

The records of the family court shall be public records, except that records of hearings in matters set forth in §

14-1-5

, together with stenographic notes and transcripts of those hearings, shall not be available for public inspection unless the court shall otherwise order. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, the records of the family court in criminal matters involving adults shall be public records. The record of delinquent or wayward adjudications of juveniles may be accessed by law enforcement personnel to be used for law enforcement purposes only and shall remain otherwise confidential. The Attorney General shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to facilitate the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 223, § 1.

8-10-22.
Intake department — Duties.

Within the family court there shall be established an intake department. Its duties shall be to receive applications and complaints relative to juvenile matters presented to the court, to provide for a thorough investigation of the applications and complaints, and to report thereon to the court before formal petition is filed. The intake department shall perform such other duties as shall be assigned to it by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

8-10-11

; P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-23.
Intake supervisors.

The justices of the family court, or a majority of them, shall appoint a chief intake supervisor and two (2) assistant intake supervisors who are qualified by education, training, previous experience in professional social welfare, personality, character, and special aptitude for the work, to serve at the pleasure of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-23.1.
Statewide juvenile hearing board.

The chief judge of the family court shall appoint a statewide juvenile hearing board coordinator who is qualified by education, training, previous experience in professional social welfare, personality, character, and special aptitude for the work, to serve at the pleasure of the chief judge. The juvenile hearing board coordinator shall provide education, training, data collection and analysis, coordination, and assistance to cities and towns in the establishment and maintenance of juvenile hearing boards and teen courts. Juvenile hearing boards and/or teen courts shall report any data deemed necessary by the family court to perform the functions of the juvenile hearing board coordinator. No juvenile hearing board or teen court in the State of Rhode Island shall hear, or dispose of offenses that constitute felony offenses if committed by an adult, except by the express written consent of the chief justice of the family court; nor shall any juvenile hearing board or teen court hear or dispose of any offense which has been amended from a felony offense to a misdemeanor offense, except by the express written consent of the chief justice of the family court. Juveniles, wherever they may live, upon a decision to refer the juvenile to the juvenile hearing board or teen court, shall be referred to the hearing board or teen court in the city or town where the offense was committed; provided, however, if the city or town does not have a hearing board or teen court, the juvenile shall be referred to the hearing board or teen court where the juvenile resides. The Statewide hearing board coordinator is responsible for setting up a statewide community service program which may be utilized by any hearing board or teen court.

The position of statewide juvenile hearing board coordinator is a pilot program which shall commence on July 1, 1998 and terminate on June 30, 2001, unless extended by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 418, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 192, § 1.

8-10-23.2.
Creating a juvenile hearing board.

The town of North Kingstown shall have the authority to create a juvenile hearing board subject to the provisions of §

8-10-23.1

, notwithstanding the requirements of the town’s regulations, charter, or ordinances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 352, § 1.

8-10-23.3.
Jamestown juvenile hearing board.

The town of Jamestown shall have the authority to create a juvenile hearing board subject to the provisions of §

8-10-23.1

, and the requirements of the town’s regulations, charter or ordinances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 166, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 15.

8-10-23.4.
North Providence juvenile hearing board.

The town of North Providence shall use the authority to create a juvenile hearing board subject to the provisions of §

8-10-23.1

, notwithstanding the requirements of the town’s regulations, charter or ordinances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 15.

8-10-24.
Sessions, motions, assignments, etc.

The provisions of chapter 7 of this title, relating to the superior court, shall apply to the family court, except as the family court may otherwise by rule provide.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-25 — 8-10-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 52, § 2.

8-10-28.
Authority and duties of clerk.

In addition to any other authority or duties provided by this chapter, the clerk of the family court shall have the authority and carry out the duties with respect to the family court that are exercised or performed by the clerks of the superior court for that court pursuant to the provisions of §§

8-4-8

,

8-4-9

, and

8-4-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-29.
Report of divorce proceedings to director of health.

The clerk of the family court shall make returns to the director of health, on or before the first day of March in each and every year, for the year ending on the thirty-first day of December preceding, of all the applications for divorce, showing the number of applications, the number thereof continued, the number granted, and the causes for which they are granted, but without the names of the parties, in accordance with the blanks which shall be furnished him or her by the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-30.
Appointment of clerk pro tempore.

In case of the death, resignation, absence, inability, or refusal to serve of the clerk, the chief judge of the family court may appoint a clerk pro tempore who shall hold his or her office until the clerk shall have returned or the inability shall have been removed or another clerk shall have been appointed to fill the vacancy and shall have qualified. The clerk so appointed shall be sworn and give bond before he or she enters upon his or her duties and shall, during the term of service, be entitled to the compensation of the office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-31.
Appointment of deputies.

The clerk of the family court, with the approval of the chief judge of the court, may appoint one or more deputy clerks who, being sworn, may discharge all the duties of the clerk until removed by the clerk or the court. The clerk shall fix the compensation of his or her deputies within the amount appropriated therefor and shall be liable for his or her misconduct or neglect of duty.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-32.
Employment of clerical assistance by clerk.

The clerk of the family court, with the approval of the chief judge thereof, shall appoint as many assistant clerks as may be necessary, who shall hold office until removal by the clerk or by a majority of the justices.

The clerk is hereby authorized and empowered to employ such clerical assistants, in addition to the assistant clerks, as he or she may require in his or her office in copying, recording, indexing, and attending upon the files of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-33.
Powers of assistant clerks of family court.

Each of the assistant clerks of the family court shall aid his or her principal in the discharge of his or her duties, and any act done by him or her, under direction of the clerk, in the line of duty of the clerk shall have the same force and effect as though done by the clerk; he or she shall have authority to administer oaths to parties, witnesses, and others as required in the conduct of the proceedings of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-34.
Court secretary and assistant.

The justices of the family court, or a majority of them, may appoint a secretary and an assistant secretary who shall hold office during the pleasure of the court and shall perform such duties as may be required by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-35.
Appointment of stenographers.

The justices of the family court, or a majority of them, shall appoint competent shorthand writers or stenotypists for regular service in the court and one or more such writers for occasional service therein in the absence of other appointees, who shall be known as court stenographers. They shall serve during the pleasure of the court and where designated by the chief judge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1.

8-10-36.
Court reporters and court recording clerks — Supplies and preservation of notes and other materials.

All books, papers, recording media, and supplies necessary for the use of the court reporters and court recording clerks or similar recording personnel shall be furnished by the state, and the notebooks used and notes and recordings taken by them shall be the property of the state and be deposited with the clerk of the family court, provided, that the clerks shall not be required to preserve the notebooks and notes and recordings beyond the period of fifteen (15) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 3.

8-10-37.
Report of trials — Transcripts.

Subject to the provisions of §

8-10-21

, court reporters shall report stenographically, or court recording clerks or similar recording personnel shall report electronically, the proceedings in the trial of every action or proceeding, civil or criminal, in the family court. Each court reporter or court recording clerk or similar recording personnel shall also, upon the order of any justice of the court, transcribe or otherwise reproduce his or her report to be filed with the papers in the case. He or she shall also make a transcript or otherwise reproduce the whole or any part of the report upon the written request, filed with the clerk, by either party to the action or proceeding, and when completed and within the time limited by the court for filing the transcript, shall immediately deliver the same to the party ordering it, or to the attorney of record of the party, and in the case of transcription by court reporters for such service shall be paid a reasonable compensation, not less than five dollars ($5.00) and not exceeding three dollars ($3.00) per page for originals and one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page for copies thereof to be allowed by the court; and, in case the transcript is used in subsequent proceedings in the cause, the cost of the transcript may be allowed as part of the costs. In the case of electronic court recordings the person making the recordings or another person so designated by the court may be requested or ordered, in lieu of making a transcript, to reproduce the recording and certify its authenticity, and in such case each party requesting the reproduction shall pay to the court the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) per cassette.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 95, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 473, § 1.